src/noun-sme-morph.txt
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ==========================================================================
!                     North Sámi morphological analyser                     
! ==========================================================================


!! !!!Lexica for nominal declension classes
! =========================================



!! !!Lexica for nouns
! ----------------

!! !Bisyllabic nouns
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON GOAHTI-A !!= * __@CODE@__ pga errortag-branch
 GOAHTI ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-I  !!= * __@CODE@__ pga errortag-branch
 GOAHTI-IU ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-U  !!= * __@CODE@__ pga errortag-branch
 GOAHTI-IU ;


LEXICON GOAHTI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;
 
LEXICON SPILE !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-OBL-FULLPX ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON VIELLJA !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-OBL-FULLPX ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;
 
LEXICON VARRA !!= * __@CODE@__  No -laš  Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N+Err/Sub: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON AKCU !!= * __@CODE@__  No -heapme, no wg+Foc/han (ávččuhit, ávččuhan, ávččuhat.  Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%> GOAHTI-OBL ; replaced by individual pointers:
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ; 
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl, repalced by individual pointers
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K_not_ge ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K_not_ge ;
 +N+SgGenCmp+Use/NG:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>X4k K ;
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +N+Err/Sub: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N+Err/Sub: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON GOAHTI-IU !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-IU-OBL ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON CEAHCI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-IU-OBL-FULLPX ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GOAHTILONG !!= * __@CODE@__ Long nom-compound-forms,long gen
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GOAHTILONGSHORT !!= * __@CODE@__ Sometimes long nom-compound-forms,long gen
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ; 
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
! +N+SgGenCmp:%>X8 R ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON ALBMI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ; 
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Err/Sub:%>X8 K ; ! 
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! short gen comp
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON AHCCI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 FAMILY_GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP FAMILY_GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:%>X8 K ; ! 
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! short gen comp
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON ALBMILONG !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:%>X8 K ; ! 
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON IPMI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 FAMILY_GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP FAMILY_GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:%>X8 K ; ! 
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON ALBMILONGSHORT !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:%>X8 K ; ! 
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON LOTLOHKU !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
! +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
! +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
! +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
  +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp+Use/NG:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
   +N+Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;



LEXICON AIGI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen.
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 ! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ; 
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;  
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N:%>X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;
